Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1428.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 6, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-911, to read: START_STATUTE23-911. Workers' compensation; proof of insurance; public database; notice; definition A. If an insurer issues a zero estimated exposure policy, the zero estimated exposure policy shall include a statement signed by the applicant that attests to the accuracy of the information provided in the application and that the applicant has no employees and an estimated exposure of zero, as follows: I attest that the information provided on this application is current, true, correct, accurate and complete to the best of my knowledge and belief. I further attest that I do not have any employees and an estimated exposure of zero. If I employ an employee during the policy period, I will provide written notification to my workers' compensation insurer of the employment within sixty days and will include the estimated payroll and classification codes of the new employee. I understand that an intent to defraud or any omission or misrepresentation contained in this application is unlawful. B. If an employer that provides business construction and improvement services obtains a zero estimated exposure policy, the employer shall provide to each entity with which the employer directly contracts a copy of the policy and written notification that states that the employer has a total estimated exposure of zero. An entity that receives written notice under this subsection shall retain the notice and the policy for at least three years after the date of receipt. C. FOR ANY construction-related WORKERS' COMPENSATION POLICY WITH ZERO ESTIMATED EXPOSURE, ANY CERTIFICATE OF INSURANCE REQUESTED SHALL CONTAIN THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT "TO CONFIRM THE STATUS OF THE WORKERS' COMPENSATION POLICY, GO TO EWCCV.COM/CVS/". D. For the purposes of this section, "Zero estimated exposure policy" means an insurance policy that is obtained by an employer to cover the employer's liability to pay compensation after the employer reports a total estimated exposure of zero.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Applicability Section 23-911, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, applies to zero estimated exposure policies and any related certificates of insurance that are entered into or prepared on or after July 1, 2027. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.